Nebraska, session 109, LB1219.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1219 LB1219
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, and notwithstanding the
Property Tax Growth Limitation Act and the School District Property Tax
Limitation Act, the total amount of property taxes that may be levied by
a political subdivision in any year shall not exceed the total amount
levied in the prior year by more than the allowable growth percentage.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Allowable growth percentage means a percentage equal to the sum
of (i) two percent plus (ii) the political subdivision's real growth
percentage;
(b) Real growth percentage means the percentage obtained by dividing
(i) the political subdivision's real growth value by (ii) the political
subdivision's total property valuation from the prior year; and
(c) Real growth value means the increase in a political
subdivision's total property valuation from the prior year to the current
year due to (i) improvements to real property as a result of new
construction and additions to existing buildings, (ii) any other
improvements to real property which increase the value of such property,
(iii) annexation of real property by the political subdivision, (iv) a
change in the use of real property, and (v) any increase in personal
property valuation over the prior year.
-2-